Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1005
Violations; penalty.

Any person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation who violates any of the provisions of sections 69-1001 to 69-1005 shall be deemed guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1967, c. 414, § 5, p. 1280;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 130;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 409.